Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-631
Metropolitan utilities district; social
security; employees; separate group; referendum; effect.

Sections
68-601 to 68-631 and any amendments
thereto shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, be applicable
to metropolitan utilities districts and employees and appointees of metropolitan
utilities districts. The state agency contemplated in such sections is authorized
to enter, on behalf of the State of Nebraska, into an agreement with any authorized
agent of the United States Government for the purpose of extending the benefits
of the Federal Old Age and Survivors' Insurance system, as amended by Public
Law 761, approved September 1, 1954, to the appointees and employees of each
metropolitan utilities district, and all of the appointees and employees covered
by a contributory retirement plan are hereby declared to be a separate group
for the purposes of referendum and subsequent coverage. Metropolitan utilities
districts are hereby declared to be political subdivisions as defined in section
68-602, and the Governor is authorized to appoint the board of directors of
any metropolitan utilities district as the agency designated by him or her
to supervise any referendum required to be conducted under the Social Security
Act and is authorized to make any certifications required by the act to be
made to the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1955, c. 25, § 2, p. 118;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 8;

Laws 1990, LB 820, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 11.